incubator/apertium-wal/tests/verbs.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../wal.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../wal.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Verb aac":
    aac<v><iv><pass><shortcnvb><p1><sing> : aacetta

 "Verb arggaac":
    arggaac<v><iv><cau><fut> : arggaacissana

 "Verb aafot":
    aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><prf> : aafotissibeennee
    aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><prf> : aafotissibeenna
    aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><prf> : aafotissidee
    aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><imfr> : aafotissii
    aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : aafotissiis
    aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : aafotissiisi

 "Verb aakk":
    aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : aasissidagaani
    aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : aasissidagaap$
    aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : aasissidagaara
    aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : aasissidagaas$
    aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : aasissidaga$
    aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : aasissidagee
    aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : aasissidagee
    aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : aasissidagoo

 "Verb aakk":
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aassara
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aassaree
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aassari
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aassari
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aassarikko
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : aassarini
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : aassarippe
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : aassarira
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : aassarissi
    aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : aassaridaani
 
 "Verb aal":
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : aalissiyogee
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : aalissiyogee
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : aalissiyogoo
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aalissiyora
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aalissiyoree
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aalissiyori
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aalissiyori
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aalissiyorikko
    aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : aalissiyorini

 "Verb aammot":
    aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl> : aammotiyogeetu
    aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+kko<post> : aammotiyogeetukko
    aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : aammotiyogeetuni
    aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : aammotiyogeetuppe
    aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : aammotiyogeetura
    aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : aammotiyogeetussi

 "Verb aatt":
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : aattidogaadaani
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : aattidogee
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : aattidogee
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : aattidogoo
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aattidora
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aattidoree
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aattidori
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aattidori
    aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aattidorikko
 
 "Verb aawat":
    aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : aawatagee
    aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : aawatagee
    aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : aawatagoo
    aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aawatara
    aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aawataree
    aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aawatari
    aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aawatari 

 "Verb afuxx":
    afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : afuxissiyageet$  
    afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : afuxissiyagee$
    afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : afuxissiyageet$
    afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : afuxissiyagee$
    afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : afuxissiyag$
    afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : afuxissiyageetoo
    afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : afuxissiyagaa
    afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : afuxissiyagaa

 "Verb ag":
    ag<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : agiis

 "Verb agg":
    agg<v><tv><longcnvb><p1><plr> : aggidi
    agg<v><tv><longcnvb><p2><plr> : aggidi
    agg<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><plr> : aggidi
    agg<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><sing><masc> : aggidi
    agg<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : aggaasi
    agg<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : aggaas
    agg<v><tv><p1><sing><neg><intr><prf> : aggabeikkinaa
    agg<v><tv><p1><sing><neg><prf> : aggabeikke
    agg<v><tv><p1><sing><imfr> : aggays
    agg<v><tv><p1><plr><imfr> : aggeettees
    agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><imfr> : aggettenna
    agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><intr><imfr> : aggettennee
    agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><intr><prf> : aggibeettennee
    agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><intr><prf> : aggibeokkonii

 "Verb ak":
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aissarikko
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : aissarini
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : aissarippe
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : aissarira
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : aissarissi
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : aissaridaani
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><abs> : aissaro
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><abs> : aissiyageeta
    ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : aissiyageetee

 "Verb akkamm":
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><prf> : akkamissidosona
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><intr><imfr> : akkamissiyonaa
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><prf> : akkamissibeennee
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><prf> : akkamissibeenna
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><prf> : akkamissidee
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><imfr> : akkamissii
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : akkamissiis
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : akkamissiisi
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><neg><imfr> : akkamissokkona
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><neg><intr><imfr> : akkamissokkonaa
    akkamm<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><imfr> : akkamissoosona

 "Verb anjj":
    anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : anjissiyoge$
    anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : anjissiyogeetoo
    anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : anjissiyogaa
    anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : anjissiyogaa
    anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : anjissiyogaa$
    anjj<v><tv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : anjissiyogaani

 "Verb att":
    att<v><iv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : attiis
    att<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : ashshiis

 "Verb att":
    att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : ashshiyageetuppe
    att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : ashshiyageetura
    att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : ashshiyageetussi
    att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : ashshiyageetudaani
    att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : ashshiyageetoo
    att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : ashshiyagaa
    att<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : ashshiyagaa

 "Verb awaajj":
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : awaajjiisi
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><plr><neg><imfr> : awaajjokkona
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><plr><neg><intr><imfr> : awaajjokkonaa
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><plr><imfr> : awaajjoosona
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><opt> : awaajjo
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><opt> : awaajjona
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><neg><opt> : awaajjoppo
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><neg><opt> : awaajjoppona
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><opt> : awaajju
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><imfr> : awaajjukku
    awaajj<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><opt> : awaajjuppu

 "Verb awcaya":
    awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : awcayaissi$
    awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : awcayaissiy$
    awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : awcayaissi$
    awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : awcayaissiy$
    awcaya<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : awcayaissi$

 "Verb azalss":
    azalss<v><tv><fut> : azalssana
    azalss<v><tv><inf><noncon><inter> : azalssanee
    azalss<v><tv><inf><obl> : azalssana
    azalss<v><tv><intr><fut> : azalssanne
    azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p1><sing> : azalssada
    azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p2><sing> : azalssada
    azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><sing><fem> : azalssada
    azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p1><plr> : azalssidi
    azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p2><plr> : azalssidi
    azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><plr> : azalssidi
    azalss<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><sing><masc> : azalssidi
    azalss<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : azalssaasi

 
